Hawaii, session 2025, SB584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 227D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is established the natural energy laboratory of Hawaii authority, which shall be a body corporate and politic and an instrumentality and agency of the State.  The authority shall be placed within the department of business, economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes, pursuant to section 26-35.  The purpose of the natural energy laboratory of Hawaii authority shall be to facilitate research, development, and commercialization of natural energy resources and ocean-related research, technology, and industry in Hawaii and to engage in retail, commercial, or tourism activities that will financially support that research, development, and commercialization at a research and technology park in Hawaii.  Its duties shall include: (1)  Establishing, managing, and operating facilities that provide sites for: (A)  Research and development; (B)  Commercial projects and businesses utilizing natural resources, such as ocean water or geothermal energy; (C)  Compatible businesses engaged in scientific and technological investigations, or retail, commercial, and tourism activities; and (D)  Businesses or educational facilities that support the primary projects and activities; (2)  Providing support, utilities, and other services to facility tenants and government agencies; (3)  Maintaining the physical structure of the facilities; (4)  Promoting and marketing these facilities; (5)  Promoting and marketing the reasonable utilization of available natural resources; (6)  Supporting ocean research and technology development projects that support national and state interests, use facilities and infrastructure in Hawaii, and foster potential commercial development; [and] (7)  Engaging in retail, commercial, and tourism activities that are not related to facilitating research, development, and commercialization of natural energy resources in Hawaii; provided that all income derived from these activities shall be deposited in the natural energy laboratory of Hawaii authority special fund[.]; and (8)  Supporting the research, development, and commercialization of aquaculture." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________